Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1077.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 29 O.S. 2021, Section 7-602, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 7-602. A. Except as otherwise provided by law, no
person may ship into or out of, transport into or out of, have in
possession with the intent to so transport, or cause to be removed
from this state:
1. Any wildlife or parts thereof, nests of wildlife, their eggs
or their young; or
2. Any endangered or threatened species.
B. Exceptions to paragraph 1 of subsection A of this section
are:
1. Dead fish or wildlife legally taken by licensed hunters or
fishermen for noncommercial purposes may be possessed, shipped, or
transported into or within the borders of this state if it is
accompanied by or has attached the appropriate certificate, license,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1077 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

or t ag as may be required by the Oklahoma Wildlife Conservation
Code, rules, or the laws of another state;
2. Rough fish products that have been completely processed into
food or other products that legally taken fish may yield may be
exported from the state;
3. Any rough fish taken by licensed commercial fishermen who
have been issued a special permit as required by Section 4-105 of
this title by the Director of Wildlife Conservation may be shipped,
transported, or exported pursuant to the permit;
4. Any fish or wildlife lawfully bred or propagated may be
shipped or transported within the confines of this state or exported
out of this state;
5. Any wildlife for which the Director has given an individual
specific written authority for its transportation into or out of the
state; or
6. Any farmed cervidae licensed pursuant to the Oklahoma Farmed
Cervidae Act; or
7. Any deceased, intact cervidae in transit into this state to
a taxidermist who is in good standing with the Secretary of State.
C. An owner or operator of a commercially licensed hunting
facility shall be permitted to transport cervidae from one in-state
hunt facility to another in-state hunt facility without a permit
issued by the Department of Wildlife Conservation.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1077 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

D. Any person convicted of violating the provisions of this
section shall be punished by a fine of not less than Fifty Dollars
($50.00) nor more than Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00), or by
imprisonment in the county jail for a period not less than ten (10)
days nor more than sixty (60) days, or by both.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON AGRICULTURE AND WILDLIFE
February 24, 2025 - DO PASS AS AMENDED

















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1077 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)